Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-512.10
Sections, how construed.

Sections 43-512 to 43-512.10 and 43-512.12 to 43-512.18 shall be interpreted so as to facilitate the determination of paternity, child, spousal, and medical support enforcement, and the conduct of reviews under such sections.

Laws 1976, LB 926, § 12;

Laws 1978, LB 960, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 345, § 6;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 73;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 14;

Laws 1991, LB 715, § 12.